Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-43] Child protective review panel.
(a) The department shall establish a child protective review panel to review
each case of child abuse or neglect that leads to near fatality or death as a
result of acts or omissions of the child's legal caretaker. Based upon its
review, the panel shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to
the director of the department. The department shall appoint members of the
child protective review panel, who may include:

(1) Any physician treating the child for abuse;

(2) Any child protective services worker assigned to
the case and the worker's supervisor;

(3) The guardian ad litem for the child, appointed
under section 587A-16, if applicable;

(4) The members of the child's multidisciplinary team
or a child protective services consultant; and

(5) Other child protective services workers and
supervisors.

(b) Members of the child protective review
panel shall serve without compensation and shall not be reimbursed for costs;
provided that state employees serving within the scope of their employment shall
receive compensation and reimbursement as provided by law or by collective
bargaining.

(c) Members of the child protective review
panel shall be immune from any liability for injuries and damages arising from
the panel's report under subsection (a).

(d) This section shall not be construed as
interfering with any authority of the department or the courts to remove, to place,
or to order any disposition on custody of an abused child under this chapter.
[L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next